Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Adequate Facilities in Fire Station

4-24-301. Separate facilities in new construction for men and women.

With respect to any fire station constructed after June 26, 2007, each municipal or county fire department, and each volunteer fire department or company is encouraged to have separate restroom facilities, showers and locker rooms for men and women.

Acts 2007, ch. 527, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding adequate fire station facilities, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 527.

4-24-302. Gender-friendly conditions in existing facilities.

Each municipal or county fire department, and each volunteer fire department or company, are urged to develop plans that, to the greatest extent possible, will create gender-friendly conditions in existing facilities.

The purpose of the plans is to identify which stations could be upgraded to accomplish a gender-friendly facility and identify which stations cannot be made gender-friendly due to space constraints, historical significance of the station, or other documented reasons why this could not be accomplished.

The plans, once developed, shall be made available upon request by the commission on firefighting personnel standards and education and from interested persons in the community.

Acts 2007, ch. 527, § 3.

4-24-303. Existing facilities that cannot be upgraded.

Existing facilities that cannot be upgraded to gender-friendly stations should be made gender-friendly to the greatest extent possible by:

Using empty or unused rooms in the station. In no event shall existing rooms, including, but not limited to, bedrooms, weight rooms, T.V. rooms, or other rooms utilized by the firefighters for relaxation or rest, be taken or redesignated for purposes of complying with this part;

With regard to restrooms, shower rooms or locker rooms, using a male/female flip sign with locks on the door when the room is being utilized by either a male or female. No restroom, shower room or locker room that is designated specifically for male or female may be used at any time by the opposite sex;

With respect to sleeping arrangements created for the purpose of complying with this part, if it is not possible to have individual sleeping quarters, privacy for everyone shall be provided by installing individual cubicles in a room or rooms designated for sleeping with a curtain or screen blocking the entrance to each individual cubicle. The cubicles shall contain at least a bed, desk, lamp and a sufficient number of lockers to provide each firefighter on a shift with a designated, private area to rest or sleep.

Acts 2007, ch. 527, § 4.